Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1125, as
amended by Section 400, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1125), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1125. A. A zone of safety is hereby created around
elementary, junior high and high schools, permitted or licensed
child care centers as defined by the Department of Human Services,
playgrounds, parks or, the residence of a victim of a sex crime, or
any facility, business, or location that primarily caters to or
provides services for minors including, but not limited to, skating
rinks, youth recreation centers, public swimming pools, arcades,
amusement parks, and water parks.
1. A person is prohibited from loitering within five hundred
(500) feet of any elementary, junior high or high school, permitted
or licensed child care center, playground, or park, or any facility,
business, or location that primarily caters to or provides services
for minors including, but not limited to, skating rinks, youth
recreation centers, public swimming pools, arcades, amusement parks,
and water parks, if the person has been convicted of a crime that

requires the person to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Registration Act or the person has been convicted of an offense in
another jurisdiction, which offense if committed or attempted in
this state, would have been punishable as one or more of the
offenses listed in Section 582 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes
and the victim was a child under the age of sixteen (16) years.
2. A person is prohibited from entering any park zone of safety
if:
a. the person has been designated as a habitual or
aggravated sex offender as provided in Section 584 of
Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or
b. the person has been convicted of an offense in another
jurisdiction, which offense, if committed or attempted
in this state, would designate the person as a
habitual or aggravated sex offender as provided in
Section 584 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
3. A person is prohibited from loitering within one thousand
(1,000) feet of the residence of his or her victim if:
a. the person who committed a sex crime against the
victim has been convicted of said crime, and
b. the person is required to register pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act.
B. A person convicted of a violation of subsection A of this
section shall be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense punishable by a
fine not exceeding Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), or
by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F of
Section 20N of this title, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of
subsection A of this section shall be guilty of a Class D1 felony
offense and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), or by imprisonment as provided for
in subsections B through F of Section 20N of this title, or by both
such fine and imprisonment. This proscription of conduct shall not
modify or remove any restrictions currently applicable to the person
by court order, conditions of probation or as provided by other
provision of law.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3040 Page 2

C. 1. A person shall be exempt from the prohibition of this
section regarding a school or a licensed or permitted child care
facility only under the following circumstances and limited to a
reasonable amount of time to complete such tasks:
a. the person is the custodial parent or legal guardian
of a child who is an enrolled student at the school or
child care facility, and
b. the person is enrolling, delivering or retrieving such
child at the school or licensed or permitted child
care center during regular school or facility hours or
for school-sanctioned or licensed-or-permitted-child-
care-center-sanctioned extracurricular activities.
Prior to entering the zone of safety for the purposes listed in
this paragraph, the person shall inform school or child care center
administrators of his or her status as a registered sex offender.
The person shall update monthly, or as often as required by the
school or center, information about the specific times the person
will be within the zone of safety as established by this section.
2. This exception shall not be construed to modify or remove
any restrictions applicable to the person by court order, conditions
of probation, or as provided by other provision of law.
D. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not
apply to any person receiving medical treatment at a hospital or
other facility certified or licensed by the State of Oklahoma to
provide medical services. As used in this subsection, "medical
treatment" shall not include any form of psychological, social or
rehabilitative counseling services or treatment programs for sex
offenders.
E. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person, who is
registered as a sex offender pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Registration Act, from attending a recognized church or religious
denomination for worship; provided, the person has notified the
religious leader of his or her status as a registered sex offender
and the person has been granted written permission by the religious
leader.
F. For purpose of prosecution of any violation of this section,
the provisions of Section 51.1 of this title shall not apply.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3040 Page 3

G. As used in this section, "park" means any outdoor public
area specifically designated as being used for recreational purposes
that is operated or supported in whole or in part by a homeowners'
association or a city, town, county, state, federal or tribal
governmental authority.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3040 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3040 Page 5